District of Columbia statutes.
28-3801

Scope — Limitation on agreements and practices.

This chapter applies to actions to enforce rights arising from a consumer credit sale or a direct installment loan.

Dec. 17, 1971, 85 Stat. 668, Pub. L. 92-200, § 4
1973 Ed., § 28-3801.
1981 Ed., § 28-3801.
Consumer protection procedures, unlawful trade practices, see § 28-3904.
Automobile Consumer Protection Act, see § 50-501.